Arkansas, session 2025, SB381.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-5-109 is repealed.
26-5-109. Annual Multistate Tax Commission report.
(a) The Department of Finance and Administration shall prepare an
annual report detailing the activities of the Multistate Tax Commission and
Arkansas's participation in the activities of the commission.
(b) The report required under this section shall:
(1) Include without limitation the recommendations of the
commission and any activity on Arkansas's behalf by representatives of the
department; and
*JLL178*
03/05/2025 9:58:30 AM JLL178

SB381
(2) Be filed with the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and
the Speaker of the House of Representatives no later than September 30 or the
next regular business day if September 30 falls on a weekend or legal
holiday.
































03/05/2025 9:58:30 AM JLL178